Maryland, session 2025, HB1117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 11B–118 of Article – Real Property of the Annotated Code of Maryland be
renumbered to be Section(s) 11B–119.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–19.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) ON REQUEST, A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION SHALL
PROMPTLY PROVIDE A MEMBER WITH AGENDAS, BACKGROUND MATERIALS, AND
MINUTES OF A MEMBERSHIP MEETING OR A MEETING OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF
THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(C) UNLESS A PAPER COPY IS REQUESTED BY THE MEMBER, MATERIALS
PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE PROVIDED
ELECTRONICALLY.

HOUSE BILL 1117 3
5–6B–19.2.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) (1) ELECTIONS, INCLUDING THE COLLECTION AND COUNTING OF
BALLOTS AND THE CERTIFYING OF RESULTS, FOR OFFICERS, COMMITTEE MEMBERS,
OR OTHER MEMBERS OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION SHALL BE CONDUCTED BY INDEPENDENT PARTIES WHO:
(I) ARE NOT CANDIDATES IN THE ELECTION; AND
(II) DO NOT HAVE A CONFLICT OF INTEREST REGARDING ANY
CANDIDATE IN THE ELECTION.
(2) A MEMBER IS AN INDEPENDENT PARTY IF THE MEMBER:
(I) COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(II) DOES NOT ELECTIONEER FOR ANY CANDIDATE; AND
(III) IS NOT SUBJECT TO AN OBJECTION BY MORE THAN 25% OF
THE ELIGIBLE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(3) REPRESENTATIVES OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION’S PROPERTY MANAGEMENT ARE NOT INDEPENDENT PARTIES.
(C) THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY RETAIN A
THIRD–PARTY VENDOR OR EMPLOY A COMMERCIAL TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM TO
CONDUCT THE ELECTION.
(D) INDIVIDUALS CONDUCTING AN ELECTION SHALL MAKE REASONABLE
EFFORTS TO ENSURE THAT THE ELECTION IS FAIR AND THAT THERE IS
ACCOUNTABILITY FOR THE PROCESS AND THE RESULTS OF THE ELECTION.
(E) A MEMBER DESIGNATED TO CONDUCT AN ELECTION WHO ACTS IN GOOD
FAITH IS NOT PERSONALLY LIABLE IN CONNECTION WITH THE CONDUCT OF THE
ELECTION.
(F) (1) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION SHALL MAKE
REASONABLE ACCOMMODATIONS, INCLUDING REASONABLE USE OF ANY PORTIONS
OF THE COOPERATIVE PROJECT POSSESSED IN COMMON BY THE MEMBERS, FOR

HOUSE BILL 1117
MEMBERS ENGAGED IN MEMBERSHIP ORGANIZING ACTIVITIES RELATING TO
GOVERNANCE OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OR THE PROPERTY MANAGER OF A
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY NOT PREVENT MEMBERS FROM
EXERCISING RIGHTS GUARANTEED UNDER LAW OR UNDER THE GOVERNING
DOCUMENTS OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION, OR RETALIATE
AGAINST MEMBERS FOR DOING SO.
(G) PROVISIONS OF THE BYLAWS OR OTHER GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF A
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION REGARDING THE CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS
THAT ARE INCONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION ARE
UNENFORCEABLE AND VOID.
5–6B–29.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) FOR THE COLLECTION OF REGULAR DUES, FINES, FEES, INCLUDING
ADMINISTRATIVE FEES FOR PROVIDING COPIES OF COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION RECORDS, AND OTHER ASSESSMENTS, A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION MAY NOT:
(1) UNREASONABLY RESTRICT THE METHOD OR FORM OF PAYMENT,
OR THE PROCEDURES FOR REMITTING PAYMENT FROM MEMBERS; OR
(2) DISCRIMINATE AGAINST MEMBERS IN:
(I) THE LEVEL OF ACCESS TO ONLINE PAYMENT PORTALS;
(II) THE ACCEPTED METHODS OF PAYMENT; OR
(III) THE TIME TAKEN TO PROCESS PAYMENTS.
(C) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY NOT ASSESS A FINE, LATE
FEE, OR OTHER PENALTY FOR A DELAY BY THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION OR ITS AGENT IN PROCESSING AND APPLYING A PAYMENT BY A
MEMBER.
(D) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY ASSESS AGAINST A
MEMBER ACTUAL COSTS INCURRED BY THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION
FOR PROCESSING CERTAIN METHODS OF PAYMENT, INCLUDING PROCESSING OF A
PAYMENT BY CREDIT CARD OR WIRE TRANSFER.

HOUSE BILL 1117 5
(E) (1) ON REQUEST BY A MEMBER, A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION SHALL PROMPTLY PROVIDE TO THE MEMBER AN ITEMIZED, WRITTEN
STATEMENT CONFIRMING RECEIPT OF ANY PAYMENT MADE BY THE MEMBER AND
DETAILING THE APPLICATION OF PAYMENT FUNDS, INCLUDING FUNDS APPLIED TO:
(I) MEMBER DUES;
(II) PRINCIPAL OR INTEREST ON ANY OUTSTANDING DEBT;
(III) FINES, PENALTIES, AND OTHER ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE;
AND
(IV) ANY OTHER AMOUNTS THAT THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION CLAIMS WERE OWED.
(2) AT LEAST ANNUALLY, A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION
SHALL PROVIDE EACH MEMBER WITH A WRITTEN STATEMENT:
(I) ITEMIZING ALL PAYMENTS MADE BY THE MEMBER TO THE
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION DURING THE PERIOD SINCE THE LAST
STATEMENT;
(II) EXPLAINING HOW PAYMENT FUNDS WERE APPLIED; AND
(III) LISTING ANY REMAINING DEBTS OWED TO THE
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION BY THE MEMBER.
(3) UNLESS A MEMBER REQUESTS A PRINTED STATEMENT, A
STATEMENT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE DELIVERED
ELECTRONICALLY.
5–6B–30.
(a) [The] EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN § 5–6B–30.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE dispute settlement mechanism provided by this section applies to any
complaint or demand formally arising on or after October 1, 2023, unless the bylaws of the
cooperative housing corporation or the proprietary lease of the member who is a party to
the dispute state otherwise.
(b) (1) Except as provided in this subsection, a governing body may not impose
a fine, suspend voting, bring an action in court to evict, or infringe on any other rights of a
member for a violation of:

HOUSE BILL 1117
(i) The rules of the cooperative housing corporation; or
(ii) The provisions of the member’s proprietary lease.
(2) The governing body shall send to the member, via certified mail, return
receipt requested, at the address of record for notice purposes with the cooperative housing
corporation a written demand to cease and desist from the alleged violation specifying:
(i) The alleged violation;
(ii) The action required to abate the violation; and
(iii) 1. A time period of not less than 15 days during which the
violation may be abated without further sanction if the violation is a continuing one; or
2. A statement that any further violation of the same rule
may result in the imposition of sanction after notice and the opportunity for a hearing if
the violation is not continuing.
(3) (i) If the violation continues past the period specified under
paragraph (2)(iii)1 of this subsection, or if the same rule is violated subsequently, the
governing body shall send to the member, via certified mail, return receipt requested, at
the address of record for notice purposes with the cooperative housing corporation a written
notice of the member’s right to request a hearing to be held by the governing body in session.
(ii) The notice shall specify:
1. The nature of the alleged violation;
2. The proposed sanction to be imposed;
3. The procedure for requesting a hearing; and
4. The time frame for requesting a hearing, which may not
be less than 10 days beginning on the date of the notice.
(4) (i) If the member requests a hearing within the time frame specified
in the notice given under paragraph (3) of this subsection, the governing body shall hold a
hearing on the alleged violation in executive session.
(ii) The governing body shall give the member at least 10 days’
written notice of the time and place of the hearing.
(iii) At the hearing, the member shall have the right to present
evidence and to present and cross–examine witnesses regarding the alleged violation.

HOUSE BILL 1117 7
(iv) Prior to imposing any sanction on the member, the governing
body shall place in the minutes of the meeting proof of the notice provided to the member
under paragraph (3) of this subsection, which shall include:
1. A copy of the notice, together with a statement of the date
and manner of providing the notice; or
2. A statement that the member in fact appeared at the
hearing.
(v) The governing body shall place in the minutes of the meeting the
results of the hearing and the sanction, if any, imposed on the member.
(5) If the member does not request a hearing within the time frame
specified in the notice given under paragraph (3) of this subsection, the governing body, at
the next meeting, shall deliberate as to whether the violation occurred and decide whether
a sanction is appropriate for the violation.
(c) A member may appeal a decision of a governing body made in accordance with
the dispute settlement procedure described in this section to the courts of Maryland.
(d) (1) If a member fails to comply with this subtitle, the bylaws of a
cooperative housing corporation, or a decision rendered by the governing body in accordance
with this section, the governing body or any other member of the cooperative housing
corporation may sue the member for any damages caused by the failure or for injunctive
relief.
(2) The prevailing party in a proceeding authorized under this subsection
is entitled to an award for reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by court.
(e) The failure of a governing body to enforce a provision of this [title] SUBTITLE,
the proprietary lease of a member, or the bylaws of the cooperative housing corporation on
any occasion is not a waiver of the right to enforce the provision on any other occasion.
5–6B–30.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) (1) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION OR ITS AGENT MAY NOT
TAKE ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A UNIT OWNER WITHOUT PROVIDING NOTICE
REQUIRED UNDER § 5–6B–30 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) IF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION HAS REASON TO
BELIEVE THAT A MEMBER DOES NOT RESIDE AT THE UNIT ASSIGNED TO THE
MEMBER, THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE
REQUIRED UNDER § 5–6B–30 OF THIS SUBTITLE TO THE UNIT OF THE MEMBER AND

HOUSE BILL 1117
ANY KNOWN ALTERNATE ADDRESS OF THE MEMBER AND, IF APPLICABLE, TO ANY
REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MEMBER.
(C) DURING A DISPUTE, IF A MEMBER CONTINUES TO REMIT ALL MEMBER
DUES AND FEES REGULARLY REQUIRED OF ALL MEMBERS UNDER THE GOVERNING
DOCUMENTS OR PROPRIETARY LEASE, A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION
MAY NOT:
(1) RESTRICT ACCESS TO OR USE OF AMENITIES AVAILABLE TO ALL
OTHER MEMBERS BY THE MEMBER, THE MEMBER’S HOUSEHOLD, OR A TENANT OF
THE MEMBER’S UNIT;
(2) CHARGE ADDITIONAL FEES OR FINES BEYOND STANDARD DUES
AND FEES, INCLUDING MONTHLY OR ANNUAL MEMBER DUES;
(3) REASSIGN PAYMENTS REMITTED BY THE MEMBER FOR REGULAR
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION DUES AND FEES TO ANY OTHER ALLEGED
DEBTS;
(4) ACCELERATE ANY PAYMENTS BY THE MEMBER FOR DUES, FEES,
PENALTIES, INTEREST, COSTS, OR ANY OTHER MONEY ALLEGEDLY DUE TO THE
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION; OR
(5) CHARGE INTEREST ON FEES OR FINES THAT ARE CLAIMED TO
HAVE ACCRUED AS THE RESULT OF THE DISPUTED ACTIONS OR FAILURES TO ACT OF
THE MEMBER.
(D) (1) (I) IN ADDITION TO ANY ATTORNEY’S FEES AWARDED UNDER §
5–6B–30 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COURT OR AN ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE
COUNTY TO CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION IN A DISPUTE MAY AWARD COSTS AND
EXPENSES RELATING TO THE DISPUTE TO A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION
THAT IS THE PREVAILING PARTY.
(II) THE COURT OR ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY TO
CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION MAY AWARD REASONABLE COSTS AND EXPENSES
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH ONLY IF THE COURT OR ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE
COUNTY TO CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION ISSUES A WRITTEN RULING
SPECIFYING THE AMOUNT OF THE AWARD.
(III) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY NOT,
THROUGH ANY MEANS, REQUIRE A MEMBER TO PAY FOR ANY ATTORNEY’S FEES,
COSTS, OR EXPENSES RELATED TO A DISPUTE UNLESS AWARDED TO THE
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1117 9
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY ATTORNEY’S FEES AWARDED UNDER §
5–6B–30 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COURT OR ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY
TO CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION MAY AWARD TO A MEMBER WHO IS A
PREVAILING PARTY:
(I) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AGAINST A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION AND ITS AGENTS;
(II) REASONABLE COSTS AND EXPENSES RELATING TO THE
DISPUTE;
(III) COMPENSATORY DAMAGES; AND
(IV) FOR WILLFUL OR INTENTIONAL VIOLATIONS BY A
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION, TREBLE DAMAGES.
(3) ATTORNEY’S FEES UNDER § 5–6B–30 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND
COSTS, EXPENSES, AND DAMAGES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE AWARDED ONLY
AFTER ALL APPEALS BY THE PARTIES HAVE BEEN EXHAUSTED.
(E) AN OFFICER, A BOARD MEMBER, OR ANY OTHER PERSON SERVING AS A
MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION, OR
A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE PROPERTY MANAGER OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION, MAY NOT SERVE AS AN ADJUDICATOR FOR A DISPUTE PROCEEDING
IN WHICH THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION, ITS GOVERNING BODY, OR
THE PROPERTY MANAGER IS ALSO A PARTY.
(F) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE INTERPRETED TO:
(1) PROHIBIT A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION FROM:
(I) COLLECTING DUES, FEES, FINES, AND REASONABLE
INTEREST UNRELATED TO A DISPUTE;
(II) COLLECTING FEES, FINES, AND REASONABLE INTEREST IF
THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION IS GRANTED A JUDGMENT FOR SUCH
AMOUNTS; OR
(III) ENFORCING ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST A MEMBER
OTHERWISE PERMITTED BY LAW; OR

HOUSE BILL 1117
(2) LIMIT THE RIGHTS OF A MEMBER AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED
UNDER LAW OR UNDER THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OR PROPRIETARY LEASE.
(G) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE, ANY
BYLAW OR PROVISION OF A GOVERNING DOCUMENT OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION THAT CONFLICTS WITH THIS SECTION IS VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE.
5–6B–32.
(a) (1) Except as provided in §§ 5–6B–08 through 5–6B–10 [and §], 5–6B–12,
5–6B–19.1, 5–6B–19.2, 5–6B–29.1, AND 5–6B–30.1 of this subtitle, the provisions of
this subtitle are statewide in their effect.
(2) Except as provided in this subtitle, a county, city, or other jurisdiction
may not enact any law, ordinance, or regulation which would impose a burden or restriction
on a cooperative housing corporation that is not imposed on all other property of similar
character not a cooperative housing corporation. Any such law, ordinance, or regulation is
preempted by the subject and material of this title and is void.
Article – Real Property
11–109.5.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) ON REQUEST, THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS OR BOARD OF DIRECTORS
SHALL PROMPTLY PROVIDE A UNIT OWNER WITH AGENDAS, BACKGROUND
MATERIALS, AND MINUTES OF A MEMBERSHIP MEETING OR A MEETING OF THE
GOVERNING BODY OF THE CONDOMINIUM.
(C) UNLESS A PAPER COPY IS REQUESTED BY A UNIT OWNER, MATERIALS
PROVIDED TO THE UNIT OWNER UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE
PROVIDED ELECTRONICALLY.
11–109.6.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) (1) ELECTIONS, INCLUDING THE COLLECTION AND COUNTING OF
BALLOTS AND THE CERTIFYING OF RESULTS, FOR OFFICERS OR MEMBERS OF THE
GOVERNING BODY OTHER THAN THE FULL MEMBERSHIP OF THE COUNCIL OF UNIT
OWNERS SHALL BE CONDUCTED BY INDEPENDENT PARTIES WHO:
(I) ARE NOT CANDIDATES IN THE ELECTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1117 11
(II) DO NOT HAVE A CONFLICT OF INTEREST REGARDING ANY
CANDIDATE IN THE ELECTION.
(2) A UNIT OWNER IS AN INDEPENDENT PARTY IF THE UNIT OWNER:
(I) COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION;
(II) DOES NOT ELECTIONEER FOR ANY CANDIDATE; AND
(III) IS NOT SUBJECT TO AN OBJECTION BY MORE THAN 25% OF
THE ELIGIBLE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS.
(3) REPRESENTATIVES OF THE CONDOMINIUM’S PROPERTY
MANAGEMENT ARE NOT INDEPENDENT PARTIES.
(C) THE GOVERNING BODY MAY RETAIN A THIRD–PARTY VENDOR OR
EMPLOY A COMMERCIAL TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM TO CONDUCT AN ELECTION.
(D) INDIVIDUALS CONDUCTING AN ELECTION SHALL MAKE REASONABLE
EFFORTS TO ENSURE THAT THE ELECTION IS FAIR AND THAT THERE IS
ACCOUNTABILITY FOR THE PROCESS AND THE RESULTS OF THE ELECTION.
(E) A UNIT OWNER DESIGNATED TO CONDUCT AN ELECTION WHO ACTS IN
GOOD FAITH IS NOT PERSONALLY LIABLE IN CONNECTION WITH THE CONDUCT OF
THE ELECTION.
(F) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL MAKE REASONABLE
ACCOMMODATIONS, INCLUDING REASONABLE USE OF ANY PORTION OF COMMON
AREAS, FOR UNIT OWNERS TO ENGAGE IN ORGANIZING ACTIVITIES RELATING TO
GOVERNANCE OF THE CONDOMINIUM.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY MAY NOT PREVENT UNIT OWNERS FROM
OR RETALIATE AGAINST UNIT OWNERS FOR EXERCISING RIGHTS GUARANTEED
UNDER LAW OR UNDER THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF THE CONDOMINIUM.
(G) PROVISIONS OF THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, RULES, OR
REGULATIONS OF A CONDOMINIUM RELATING TO THE CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS
THAT ARE INCONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION ARE
UNENFORCEABLE AND VOID.
11–110.1.

HOUSE BILL 1117
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) FOR THE COLLECTION OF REGULAR DUES, FINES, FEES, INCLUDING
ADMINISTRATIVE FEES FOR PROVIDING COPIES OF RECORDS, AND OTHER
ASSESSMENTS, THE GOVERNING BODY MAY NOT:
(1) UNREASONABLY RESTRICT THE METHOD OR FORM OF PAYMENT,
OR THE PROCEDURES FOR REMITTING PAYMENT FROM UNIT OWNERS; OR
(2) DISCRIMINATE AGAINST UNIT OWNERS IN:
(I) THE LEVEL OF ACCESS TO ONLINE PAYMENT PORTALS;
(II) THE ACCEPTED METHODS OF PAYMENT; OR
(III) THE TIME TAKEN TO PROCESS PAYMENTS.
(C) THE GOVERNING BODY MAY NOT ASSESS A FINE, LATE FEE, OR OTHER
PENALTY FOR A DELAY IN PAYMENT CAUSED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OR AN AGENT
OF THE GOVERNING BODY IN PROCESSING AND APPLYING A PAYMENT BY A UNIT
OWNER.
(D) THE GOVERNING BODY MAY ASSESS AGAINST A UNIT OWNER ACTUAL
COSTS INCURRED FOR PROCESSING CERTAIN METHODS OF PAYMENT, INCLUDING
PROCESSING OF A PAYMENT BY CREDIT CARD OR WIRE TRANSFER.
(E) (1) ON REQUEST BY A UNIT OWNER, THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL
PROMPTLY PROVIDE TO THE UNIT OWNER AN ITEMIZED, WRITTEN STATEMENT
CONFIRMING RECEIPT OF ANY PAYMENT MADE BY THE UNIT OWNER AND DETAILING
THE APPLICATION OF PAYMENT FUNDS, INCLUDING FUNDS APPLIED TO:
(I) MONTHLY OR ANNUAL DUES;
(II) PRINCIPAL OR INTEREST ON ANY OUTSTANDING DEBT;
(III) FINES, PENALTIES, AND OTHER ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE;
AND
(IV) ANY OTHER AMOUNTS THAT THE GOVERNING BODY CLAIMS
WERE OWED.
(2) AT LEAST ANNUALLY, A GOVERNING BODY SHALL PROVIDE EACH
UNIT OWNER WITH A WRITTEN STATEMENT:

HOUSE BILL 1117 13
(I) ITEMIZING ALL PAYMENTS MADE BY THE UNIT OWNER TO
THE GOVERNING BODY DURING THE PERIOD SINCE THE LAST STATEMENT;
(II) EXPLAINING HOW PAYMENT FUNDS WERE APPLIED; AND
(III) LISTING ANY REMAINING DEBTS OWED TO THE GOVERNING
BODY BY THE UNIT OWNER.
(3) UNLESS A UNIT OWNER REQUESTS A PRINTED STATEMENT, A
STATEMENT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE DELIVERED
ELECTRONICALLY.
11–113.
(a) [Unless] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 11–113.1 OF THIS TITLE AND UNLESS
the declaration or bylaws state otherwise, the dispute settlement mechanism provided by
this section is applicable to complaints or demands formally arising on or after October 1,
2022.
(b) (1) The council of unit owners or board of directors may not impose a fine,
suspend voting, or infringe upon any other rights of a unit owner or other occupant for
violations of rules until the procedures in this subsection are followed.
(2) A written demand to cease and desist from an alleged violation shall be
provided to the alleged violator specifying:
(i) The alleged violation;
(ii) The action required to abate the violation; and
(iii) A time period, not less than 15 days, during which the violation
may be abated without further sanction, if the violation is a continuing one, or a statement
that any further violation of the same rule may result in the imposition of sanction after
notice and opportunity for hearing if the violation is not continuing.
(3) Within 12 months of the demand, if the violation continues past the
period allowed in the demand for abatement without penalty or if the same rule is violated
subsequently, the board shall provide the alleged violator, at the alleged violator’s address
of record, with a written notice of the alleged violator’s right to request a hearing to be held
by the board in executive session containing:
(i) The nature of the alleged violation;
(ii) The procedures for requesting a hearing at which the alleged
violator may produce any statement, evidence, or witnesses on behalf of the alleged violator;

HOUSE BILL 1117
(iii) The period of time for requesting a hearing, which may not be
less than 10 days from the giving of the notice; and
(iv) The proposed sanction to be imposed.
(4) (i) If the alleged violator requests a hearing within the period of
time specified in the notice provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection, the board shall
provide the alleged violator with written notice of the time and place of the hearing, which
time may not be less than 10 days after the date the request for a hearing was provided.
(ii) 1. At the hearing, the alleged violator has the right to present
evidence and present and cross–examine witnesses.
2. The hearing shall be held in executive session pursuant to
this notice and shall afford the alleged violator a reasonable opportunity to be heard.
3. A. Prior to the taking effect of any sanction hereunder,
proof of notice shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting.
B. The proof of notice shall be deemed adequate if a copy of
the notice, together with a statement of the date and manner of providing the notice, is
entered in the minutes by the officer or director who provided the notice.
C. The notice requirement shall be deemed satisfied if the
alleged violator appears at the meeting.
4. The minutes of the meeting shall contain a written
statement of the results of the hearing and the sanction, if any, imposed.
(5) If the alleged violator does not request a hearing within the period of
time specified in the notice provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection, the board, at
the next meeting, shall deliberate as to whether the violation occurred and decide whether
a sanction is appropriate for the violation.
(6) A decision in accordance with these procedures shall be appealable to
the courts of Maryland.
(c) (1) If any unit owner fails to comply with this title, the declaration, or
bylaws, or a decision rendered in accordance with this section, the unit owner may be sued
for damages caused by the failure or for injunctive relief, or both, by the council of unit
owners or by any other unit owner.
(2) The prevailing party in any proceeding under this subsection is entitled
to an award for counsel fees as determined by court.

HOUSE BILL 1117 15
(d) The failure of the council of unit owners to enforce a provision of this title, the
declaration, or bylaws on any occasion is not a waiver of the right to enforce the provision
on any other occasion.
11–113.1.
(A) THE SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) (1) A GOVERNING BODY OR ITS AGENT MAY NOT TAKE ADVERSE
ACTION AGAINST A UNIT OWNER WITHOUT PROVIDING NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER §
11–113 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) IF A GOVERNING BODY HAS REASON TO BELIEVE THAT A UNIT
OWNER DOES NOT RESIDE AT THEIR UNIT, THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL PROVIDE
NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER § 11–113 OF THIS TITLE TO THE UNIT OWNER’S UNIT AND
ANY KNOWN ALTERNATE ADDRESS OF THE UNIT OWNER AND, IF APPLICABLE, TO
ANY REPRESENTATIVE OF THE UNIT OWNER.
(C) (1) THE PERIOD OF TIME FOR A UNIT OWNER TO REQUEST A HEARING
UNDER § 11–113 OF THIS TITLE MAY NOT BE LESS THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE BOARD
PROVIDES NOTICE TO THE UNIT OWNER.
(2) IF A UNIT OWNER REQUESTS A HEARING UNDER § 11–113 OF THIS
TITLE, THE HEARING MAY NOT BE HELD LESS THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE
REQUEST FOR A HEARING WAS PROVIDED BY THE UNIT OWNER.
(D) DURING A DISPUTE, IF A UNIT OWNER CONTINUES TO REMIT TO THE
GOVERNING BODY ALL DUES AND FEES REGULARLY REQUIRED OF ALL UNIT OWNERS
UNDER THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, RULES, OR REGULATIONS OF THE
CONDOMINIUM, THE GOVERNING BODY MAY NOT:
(1) RESTRICT ACCESS TO OR USE OF AMENITIES AVAILABLE TO ALL
OTHER UNIT OWNERS BY THE UNIT OWNER, MEMBERS OF THE UNIT OWNER’S
HOUSEHOLD, OR A TENANT OF THE UNIT OWNER;
(2) CHARGE ADDITIONAL FEES OR FINES BEYOND STANDARD DUES
AND FEES, INCLUDING MONTHLY OR ANNUAL DUES;
(3) REASSIGN PAYMENTS REMITTED BY THE UNIT OWNER FOR
REGULAR DUES AND FEES TO ANY OTHER ALLEGED DEBTS;
(4) ACCELERATE ANY PAYMENTS BY THE UNIT OWNER FOR DUES,
FEES, PENALTIES, INTEREST, COSTS, OR ANY OTHER MONEY ALLEGEDLY DUE TO
THE GOVERNING BODY;

HOUSE BILL 1117
(5) CHARGE INTEREST ON FEES OR FINES THAT ARE CLAIMED TO
HAVE ACCRUED AS THE RESULT OF THE DISPUTED ACTIONS OR FAILURES TO ACT OF
THE UNIT OWNER; OR
(6) RECORD A LIEN ON THE UNIT OWNER’S UNIT.
(E) (1) (I) IN ADDITION TO ANY COUNSEL FEES AWARDED UNDER §
11–113 OF THIS TITLE, THE COURT OR ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY TO
CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION IN A DISPUTE MAY AWARD COSTS AND EXPENSES
RELATING TO THE DISPUTE TO A GOVERNING BODY THAT IS THE PREVAILING PARTY.
(II) THE COURT OR ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY TO
CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION MAY AWARD REASONABLE COSTS AND EXPENSES
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH ONLY IF THE COURT, ARBITRATOR, OR ENTITY
AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY TO CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION ISSUES A
WRITTEN RULING SPECIFYING THE AMOUNT OF THE AWARD.
(III) A GOVERNING BODY MAY NOT, THROUGH ANY MEANS,
REQUIRE A UNIT OWNER TO PAY FOR ANY ATTORNEY’S FEES, COSTS, OR EXPENSES
RELATED TO A DISPUTE UNLESS AWARDED TO THE GOVERNING BODY BY A COURT
OR ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY TO CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY ATTORNEY’S FEES AWARDED UNDER §
11–113 OF THIS TITLE, THE COURT OR ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY TO
CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION MAY:
(I) AWARD TO A UNIT OWNER WHO IS A PREVAILING PARTY:
1. REASONABLE COSTS AND EXPENSES RELATING TO
THE DISPUTE;
2. COMPENSATORY DAMAGES; AND
3. FOR WILLFUL OR INTENTIONAL VIOLATIONS BY A
CONDOMINIUM, TREBLE DAMAGES; AND
(II) GRANT INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AGAINST THE GOVERNING
BODY AND ITS AGENTS.

HOUSE BILL 1117 17
(3) ATTORNEY’S FEES UNDER § 11–113 OF THIS TITLE AND COSTS,
EXPENSES, AND DAMAGES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE AWARDED ONLY AFTER
ALL APPEALS BY THE PARTIES HAVE BEEN EXHAUSTED.
(F) AN OFFICER, A BOARD MEMBER, OR ANY OTHER PERSON SERVING AS A
MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY, OR A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE PROPERTY
MANAGER OF THE CONDOMINIUM, MAY NOT SERVE AS AN ADJUDICATOR FOR A
DISPUTE PROCEEDING IN WHICH THE GOVERNING BODY OR THE PROPERTY
MANAGER IS ALSO A PARTY.
(G) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE INTERPRETED TO:
(1) PROHIBIT A GOVERNING BODY FROM:
(I) COLLECTING DUES, FEES, FINES, AND REASONABLE
INTEREST UNRELATED TO A DISPUTE;
(II) COLLECTING FEES, FINES, AND REASONABLE INTEREST IF
THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION IS GRANTED A JUDGMENT FOR SUCH
AMOUNTS; OR
(III) ENFORCING ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST A MEMBER
OTHERWISE PERMITTED BY LAW; OR
(2) LIMIT THE RIGHTS OF A UNIT OWNER OTHERWISE PROVIDED
UNDER LAW OR UNDER THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, RULES, OR REGULATIONS OF
THE CONDOMINIUM.
(H) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS TITLE, ANY
PROVISION OF THE RULES, REGULATIONS, OR OTHER GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF A
CONDOMINIUM THAT CONFLICTS WITH THIS SECTION IS VOID AND
UNENFORCEABLE.
11–122.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a county, city, or other jurisdiction
may not enact any law, ordinance, or regulation which would impose a burden or restriction
on a condominium that is not imposed on all other property of similar character not
subjected to a condominium regime. Any such law, ordinance, or regulation is void. Except
as otherwise expressly provided in §§ 11–109.5, 11–109.6, 11–110.1, 11–113.1, 11–130,
11–138, 11–139, and 11–140 of this title, the provisions of this title are statewide in their
effect. Any law, ordinance, or regulation enacted by a county, city, or other jurisdiction is
preempted by the subject and material of this title.

HOUSE BILL 1117
11B–111.4.
(a) This section does not apply to any meetings of lot owners occurring at any time
before the lot owners, other than the developer, have a majority of the votes in the
homeowners association, as provided in the declaration.
(b) Subject to reasonable rules adopted by the governing body, lot owners may
meet for the purpose of considering and discussing the operation of and matters relating to
the operation of the homeowners association in any common areas or in any building or
facility in the common areas that the governing body of the homeowners association uses
for scheduled meetings.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL MAKE REASONABLE
ACCOMMODATIONS FOR LOT OWNERS TO MEET FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENGAGING IN
ORGANIZING ACTIVITIES RELATING TO GOVERNANCE OF THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION, INCLUDING REASONABLE USE OF ANY PORTION OF THE COMMON
AREAS OR ANY BUILDING OR FACILITY IN THE COMMON AREAS THAT THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION USES FOR SCHEDULED MEETINGS.
(3) THE GOVERNING BODY MAY NOT PREVENT LOT OWNERS FROM, OR
RETALIATE AGAINST LOT OWNERS FOR, EXERCISING RIGHTS GUARANTEED UNDER
LAW OR UNDER THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
11B–111.10.
(a) [Unless] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 11B–111.11 OF THIS TITLE AND
UNLESS the declaration or bylaws state otherwise, the dispute settlement mechanism
provided by this section is applicable to complaints or demands formally arising on or after
October 1, 2022.
(b) (1) The board of directors or other governing body of the homeowners
association may not impose a fine, suspend voting, or infringe on any other right of a lot
owner or any other occupant for violations of rules until the procedures in this subsection
are followed.
(2) A written demand to cease and desist from an alleged violation shall be
provided to the alleged violator specifying:
(i) The nature of the alleged violation;
(ii) The action required to abate the violation; and
(iii) A period of time, not less than 15 days, during which the violation
may be abated without further sanction, if the violation is a continuing violation, or a

HOUSE BILL 1117 19
statement that any further violation of the same rule may result in the imposition of
sanction after notice and opportunity for hearing if the violation is not continuing.
(3) Within 12 months of the demand, if the violation continues past the
period of time allowed in the demand for abatement without penalty or if the same rule is
violated subsequently, the board shall provide the alleged violator, at the alleged violator’s
address of record, with a written notice of the alleged violator’s right to request a hearing
to be held by the board in executive session containing:
(i) The nature of the alleged violation;
(ii) The procedures for requesting a hearing at which the alleged
violator may produce any statement, evidence, or witnesses on behalf of the alleged violator;
(iii) The period of time for requesting a hearing, which may not be
less than 10 days from the giving of the notice; and
(iv) The proposed sanction to be imposed.
(4) (i) If the alleged violator requests a hearing within the period of
time specified in the notice provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection, the board shall
provide the alleged violator with a written notice of the time and place of the hearing, which
time may not be less than 10 days after the date the request for a hearing was provided.
(ii) 1. At the hearing, the alleged violator has the right to present
evidence and cross–examine witnesses.
2. The hearing shall be held in executive session in
accordance with this notice and shall afford the alleged violator a reasonable opportunity
to be heard.
3. A. Prior to the taking effect of any sanction under this
section, proof of notice shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting.
B. The proof of notice shall be deemed adequate if a copy of
the notice, together with a statement of the date and manner of providing the notice, is
entered in the minutes by the officer or director who provided the notice.
C. The notice requirement shall be deemed satisfied if the
alleged violator appears at the meeting.
4. The minutes of the meeting shall contain a written
statement of the results of the hearing and the sanction, if any, imposed.
(5) If the alleged violator does not request a hearing within the period of
time specified in the notice provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection, the board, at

HOUSE BILL 1117
the next meeting, shall deliberate as to whether the violation occurred and decide whether
a sanction is appropriate for the violation.
(6) A decision made in accordance with these procedures shall be
appealable to the courts of Maryland.
(c) (1) If any lot owner fails to comply with this title, the declaration, or
bylaws, or a decision rendered in accordance with this section, the lot owner may be sued
for damages caused by the failure or for injunctive relief, or both, by the homeowners
association or by any other lot owner.
(2) The prevailing party in any proceeding under this subsection is entitled
to an award for counsel fees as determined by the court.
(d) The failure of the board of directors or other governing body of the
homeowners association to enforce a provision of this title, the declaration, or bylaws on
any occasion is not a waiver of the right to enforce the provision on any other occasion.
(e) This section does not apply to the Columbia Association or the village
community associations for the villages of Columbia in Howard County.
11B–111.11.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) (1) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION OR ITS AGENT MAY NOT TAKE
ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A UNIT OWNER WITHOUT PROVIDING NOTICE REQUIRED
UNDER § 11B–111.10 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) IF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION HAS REASON TO BELIEVE THAT
A LOT OWNER DOES NOT RESIDE AT THEIR LOT, THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION
SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER § 11B–111.10 OF THIS TITLE TO THE LOT
OWNER AT THE LOT OWNER’S LOT AND ANY KNOWN ALTERNATE ADDRESS OF THE
LOT OWNER AND, IF APPLICABLE, TO ANY REPRESENTATIVE OF THE LOT OWNER.
(C) (1) THE PERIOD OF TIME FOR A LOT OWNER TO REQUEST A HEARING
UNDER § 11B–111.10 OF THIS TITLE MAY NOT BE LESS THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE
BOARD PROVIDES NOTICE TO THE LOT OWNER.
(2) IF A LOT OWNER REQUESTS A HEARING UNDER § 11B–111.10 OF
THIS TITLE, THE HEARING MAY NOT BE HELD LESS THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE DATE
THE REQUEST FOR A HEARING WAS PROVIDED BY THE LOT OWNER.
(D) DURING A DISPUTE, IF A LOT OWNER CONTINUES TO REMIT TO THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION ALL DUES AND FEES REGULARLY REQUIRED OF ALL

HOUSE BILL 1117 21
LOT OWNERS UNDER THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, RULES, OR REGULATIONS OF
THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY NOT:
(1) RESTRICT ACCESS TO OR USE OF AMENITIES AVAILABLE TO ALL
OTHER LOT OWNERS BY THE LOT OWNER, MEMBERS OF THE LOT OWNER’S
HOUSEHOLD, OR A TENANT OF THE LOT OWNER;
(2) CHARGE ADDITIONAL FEES OR FINES BEYOND STANDARD DUES
AND FEES CHARGED TO ALL LOT OWNERS;
(3) REASSIGN PAYMENTS REMITTED BY THE LOT OWNER FOR
REGULAR DUES AND FEES TO ANY OTHER ALLEGED DEBTS;
(4) ACCELERATE ANY PAYMENTS BY THE MEMBER FOR DUES, FEES,
PENALTIES, INTEREST, COSTS, OR ANY OTHER MONEY ALLEGEDLY DUE TO THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION;
(5) CHARGE INTEREST ON FEES OR FINES THAT ARE CLAIMED TO
HAVE ACCRUED AS THE RESULT OF THE DISPUTED ACTIONS OR FAILURES TO ACT OF
THE LOT OWNER; OR
(6) RECORD A LIEN ON THE LOT OWNER’S PROPERTY IN THE
DEVELOPMENT.
(E) (1) (I) IN ADDITION TO ANY COUNSEL FEES AWARDED UNDER §
11B–111.10 OF THIS TITLE, THE COURT OR ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY TO
CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION MAY AWARD COSTS AND EXPENSES RELATING TO
THE DISPUTE TO A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION THAT IS THE PREVAILING PARTY.
(II) THE COURT OR ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY TO
CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION MAY AWARD REASONABLE COSTS AND EXPENSES
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH ONLY IF THE COURT OR ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE
COUNTY TO CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION ISSUES A WRITTEN RULING
SPECIFYING THE AMOUNT OF THE AWARD.
(III) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY NOT, THROUGH ANY
MEANS, REQUIRE A LOT OWNER TO PAY FOR ANY COUNSEL FEES, COSTS, OR
EXPENSES RELATED TO A DISPUTE UNLESS AWARDED TO THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION BY A COURT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY COUNSEL FEES AWARDED UNDER §
11B–111.10 OF THIS TITLE, THE COURT OR ENTITY AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY TO
CONDUCT DISPUTE RESOLUTION MAY:

HOUSE BILL 1117
(I) AWARD TO A LOT OWNER WHO IS A PREVAILING PARTY:
1. REASONABLE COSTS AND EXPENSES RELATING TO
THE DISPUTE;
2. COMPENSATORY DAMAGES; AND
3. FOR WILLFUL OR INTENTIONAL VIOLATIONS BY A
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, TREBLE DAMAGES; AND
(II) GRANT INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AGAINST THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION AND ITS AGENTS.
(3) COUNSEL FEES UNDER § 11B–111.10 OF THIS TITLE AND COSTS,
EXPENSES, AND DAMAGES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE AWARDED ONLY AFTER
ALL APPEALS BY THE PARTIES HAVE BEEN EXHAUSTED.
(F) AN INDIVIDUAL SERVING AS A MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, OR A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE PROPERTY MANAGER
OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, MAY NOT SERVE AS AN ADJUDICATOR FOR A
DISPUTE PROCEEDING IN WHICH THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, THE
GOVERNING BODY OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, OR THE PROPERTY
MANAGER IS ALSO A PARTY.
(G) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE INTERPRETED TO:
(1) PROHIBIT A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION FROM:
(I) COLLECTING DUES, FEES, FINES, AND REASONABLE
INTEREST UNRELATED TO A DISPUTE;
(II) COLLECTING FEES, FINES, AND ASSESSMENTS, AND
REASONABLE INTEREST ON ANY FEES, FINES, OR ASSESSMENTS, IF THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION IS GRANTED A JUDGMENT FOR SUCH AMOUNTS; OR
(III) ENFORCING ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST A LOT OWNER
OTHERWISE PERMITTED BY LAW; OR
(2) LIMIT THE RIGHTS OF A LOT OWNER OTHERWISE PROVIDED
UNDER LAW OR UNDER THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, RULES, OR REGULATIONS OF
THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.

HOUSE BILL 1117 23
(H) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS TITLE, ANY
PROVISION OF A GOVERNING DOCUMENT, RULE, OR REGULATION OF A
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION THAT CONFLICTS WITH THIS SECTION IS VOID AND
UNENFORCEABLE.
11B–113.7.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) FOR THE COLLECTION OF REGULAR DUES, FINES, FEES, INCLUDING
ADMINISTRATIVE FEES FOR PROVIDING COPIES OF RECORDS, AND OTHER
ASSESSMENTS, A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY NOT:
(1) UNREASONABLY RESTRICT THE METHOD OR FORM OF PAYMENT,
OR THE PROCEDURES FOR REMITTING PAYMENT FROM LOT OWNERS; OR
(2) DISCRIMINATE AGAINST LOT OWNERS IN:
(I) THE LEVEL OF ACCESS TO ONLINE PAYMENT PORTALS;
(II) THE ACCEPTED METHODS OF PAYMENT; OR
(III) THE TIME TAKEN TO PROCESS PAYMENTS.
(C) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY NOT ASSESS A FINE, FEE, LATE
CHARGE, OR OTHER PENALTY FOR A DELAY IN PAYMENT CAUSED BY THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION OR ITS AGENT IN PROCESSING AND APPLYING A
PAYMENT BY A LOT OWNER.
(D) IN ADDITION TO ELECTRONIC PAYMENT FEES AUTHORIZED UNDER §
11B–114 OF THIS TITLE, A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY ASSESS AGAINST A LOT
OWNER ACTUAL COSTS INCURRED BY THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION FOR
PROCESSING PAYMENTS MADE BY WIRE TRANSFER.
(E) (1) ON REQUEST BY A LOT OWNER, A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION
SHALL PROMPTLY PROVIDE TO THE LOT OWNER AN ITEMIZED, WRITTEN STATEMENT
CONFIRMING RECEIPT OF ANY PAYMENT MADE BY THE LOT OWNER AND DETAILING
THE APPLICATION OF PAYMENT FUNDS, INCLUDING FUNDS APPLIED TO:
(I) MONTHLY OR ANNUAL DUES;
(II) PRINCIPAL OR INTEREST ON ANY OUTSTANDING DEBT;

HOUSE BILL 1117
(III) FINES, PENALTIES, AND OTHER ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE;
AND
(IV) ANY OTHER AMOUNTS THAT THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION CLAIMS WERE OWED.
(2) AT LEAST ANNUALLY, A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL
PROVIDE EACH LOT OWNER WITH A WRITTEN STATEMENT:
(I) ITEMIZING ALL PAYMENTS MADE BY THE LOT OWNER TO
THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION DURING THE PERIOD SINCE THE LAST
STATEMENT;
(II) EXPLAINING HOW PAYMENT FUNDS WERE APPLIED; AND
(III) LISTING ANY REMAINING DEBTS OWED TO THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION BY THE LOT OWNER.
(3) UNLESS A LOT OWNER REQUESTS A PRINTED STATEMENT, A
STATEMENT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE DELIVERED
ELECTRONICALLY.
11B–118.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) (1) ELECTIONS FOR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION, INCLUDING THE COLLECTION AND COUNTING OF BALLOTS AND THE
CERTIFYING OF RESULTS, SHALL BE CONDUCTED BY INDEPENDENT PARTIES WHO:
(I) ARE NOT CANDIDATES FOR POSITIONS ON THE GOVERNING
BODY OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION IN THAT ELECTION; AND
(II) DO NOT HAVE A CONFLICT OF INTEREST REGARDING ANY
CANDIDATE IN THE ELECTION.
(2) (I) REPRESENTATIVES OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION’S
PROPERTY MANAGEMENT ARE NOT INDEPENDENT PARTIES.
(II) A LOT OWNER MAY BE DEEMED AN INDEPENDENT PARTY IF
THE LOT OWNER:

HOUSE BILL 1117 25
1. COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBSECTION;
2. DOES NOT ELECTIONEER FOR ANY CANDIDATE; AND
3. IS NOT SUBJECT TO AN OBJECTION BY MORE THAN
25% OF THE ELIGIBLE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
(III) THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY RETAIN A
THIRD–PARTY VENDOR OR EMPLOY A COMMERCIAL TECHNOLOGY PLATFORM TO
CONDUCT THE ELECTION.
(C) INDIVIDUALS CONDUCTING AN ELECTION SHALL MAKE REASONABLE
EFFORTS TO ENSURE THAT THE ELECTION IS FAIR AND THAT THERE IS
ACCOUNTABILITY FOR THE PROCESS AND THE RESULTS OF THE ELECTION.
(D) A LOT OWNER DESIGNATED TO CONDUCT AN ELECTION WHO ACTS IN
GOOD FAITH HAS NO PERSONAL LIABILITY IN CONNECTION WITH THE CONDUCT OF
AN ELECTION.
(E) PROVISIONS OF THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, RULES, OR
REGULATIONS OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION RELATING TO THE CONDUCT OF
ELECTIONS THAT ARE INCONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION
ARE VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing obligation
or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.